Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB86.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Jail Enforcement Model" means the United States Immigration and
Customs Enforcement program that authorizes state and local law
enforcement officers to identify and process removable aliens who are in a
jail or detention facility and have pending or active criminal charges;
(b) "Task Force Model" means the United States Immigration and Customs
Enforcement program that authorizes state and local law enforcement
officers to enforce limited immigration authority while performing routine
police duties; and
(c) "Warrant Service Officer Model" means the United States Immigration and
Customs Enforcement program that authorizes state and local law
enforcement officers to serve and execute administrative warrants on
removable aliens who are in custody.
(2) Each local law enforcement agency and the Department of Kentucky State Police
shall enter into written agreements with the United States Immigration and
Customs Enforcement to participate in the Jail Enforcement Model, Task Force
Model, and Warrant Service Officer Model programs established under Section
287(g) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. sec. 1357.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/9/2026 12:22 PM Jacketed